Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB990.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 75 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a section to read:§ 6120. Restrictions of motor vehicles based on power source prohibited.(a) Restrictions prohibited.--A State agency or political subdivision of this Commonwealth may not restrict the use, purchase or sale of motor vehicles based on the energy source used to power:(1) the motor vehicle for propulsion; or(2) other functions of the motor vehicle.(b) Applicability.--This section does not affect or invalidate any rule or policy established by a State agency or political subdivision of this Commonwealth related to the use, 12345678910111213141516171819 purchase or sale of motor vehicles owned and operated by a State agency or political subdivision.(c) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"State agency." An authority, board, department, instrumentality, institution, agency, office, including the Office of the Governor, or other unit of the Commonwealth."Use." The operation of a motor vehicle on a highway or trafficway.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0990PN1140 - 2 - 1234567891011